test/src/morphology/N-juallge_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - juällge: # -e-stammar
    juällge+N+Sg+Nom: juällge
    juällge+N+Sg+Gen: juolge
    juällge+N+Sg+Acc: juolgev
    juällge+N+Sg+Ill: juällgáj
    juällge+N+Sg+Ine: juolgen
    juällge+N+Sg+Ela: juolgest
    juällge+N+Sg+Com: juolgijn
    juällge+N+Pl+Nom: juolge
    juällge+N+Pl+Gen: juolgij
    juällge+N+Pl+Acc: juolgijt
    juällge+N+Pl+Ill: juolgijda
    juällge+N+Pl+Ine: juolgijn
    juällge+N+Pl+Ela: juolgijst
    juällge+N+Pl+Com: juolgij
    juällge+N+Ess: juällgen
    juällge+N+Abe: juolgedak
